Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-1731
Department; general powers.

The department shall have general supervision and control of credit unions as provided by the Credit Union Act, section 8-102, and any other applicable laws of this state.

Laws 1996, LB 948, § 32.